Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2450.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 103 of the act of July 10, 1984 (P.L.688, No.147), known as the Radiation Protection Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Independent spent fuel storage installation" or "ISFSI."(1) A complex designed and constructed for the interim storage of:(i) Spent nuclear fuel.(ii) Solid, reactor-related, greater than Class C waste.(iii) Other associated radioactive materials.(2) A spent fuel storage installation may be considered independent, even if it is located on the site of a facility licensed by the NRC.* * *Section 2. Section 402(b.1)(1) and (4) and (c)(1.1)(i.1) introductory paragraph and (ii) and (4) of the act are amended, subsection (c)(1.1) is amended by adding a subparagraph and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 402. Nuclear facility and transport fees.* * *(b.1) Department fees.--(1) Within 30 days of the effective date of this subsection, each person who has a current nuclear power reactor construction permit or operating license from the NRC for a site within this Commonwealth shall pay the department $100,000 per nuclear power reactor site, regardless of the number of individual nuclear power reactors located at the site. By July 1, 2007, and July 1 of each year thereafter, 20260HB2450PN3371 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each person who has a current nuclear power reactor construction permit or operating license from the NRC for a site within this Commonwealth shall pay the department an annual fee of [$650,000] $825,000 per nuclear power reactor site, regardless of the number of individual nuclear power reactors located at the site. For the purposes of this subsection only, a nuclear power reactor site shall be deemed to be the location of one or more individual nuclear power reactors which still has spent nuclear fuel stored onsite in a spent nuclear fuel pool or temporary locations outside the ISFSI, has not been fully dismantled and decommissioned pursuant to applicable Federal law and regulations and has not been granted license termination by the NRC.* * *(4) Prior to the date of a shipment that requires an escort, each shipper of spent nuclear fuel, high-level waste, transuranic waste or a large quantity of radioactive material who ships to, within, through or across this Commonwealth shall pay to the department a fee of [$500] $1,000 per individual vehicle shipment or [$1,000] $1,500 per railroad or river barge shipment.* * *(b.3) Cost recovery for shut-down reactors.--A person who owns, operates or manages a nuclear power reactor site with one or more reactors that have been permanently shut down and the spent nuclear fuel has been removed from the reactor vessel, spent nuclear fuel pool and any other temporary storage area where all spent nuclear fuel temporarily stored in dry casks onsite within an NRC-approved ISFSI shall be subject to actual agency cost recovery for any costs incurred by the agency to 20260HB2450PN3371 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 respond to or mitigate an incident at the site. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to supersede any indemnification, limitation of liability or any other provision of 42 U.S.C. § 2210 (relating to indemnification and limitation of liability).(c) Agency fees.--(1.1) * * *(i.1) By July 1, 2015, and July 1 of each year thereafter through the effective date of subparagraph (i.2), each person who has a current nuclear power reactor construction permit or operating license from the NRC for a site within this Commonwealth shall pay the agency the following fees, regardless of the number of individual nuclear power reactors located at the site:* * *(i.2) Within 30 days of the effective date of this subparagraph and July 1 of each year thereafter, each person who has a current nuclear power reactor construction permit or operating license from the NRC for a site within this Commonwealth shall pay the agency the following fees, regardless of the number of individual nuclear power reactors located at the site:(A) $375,000 to be collected and used by the agency in accordance with the provisions of 35 Pa.C.S. § 7320.(B) $225,000 to be collected and used by the agency for radiological emergency response equipment, planning, training and exercise costs involving nonagency personnel.(ii) Payments collected under subparagraphs (i)(A) [and], (i.1)(A) and (i.2)(A) shall be deposited into the 20260HB2450PN3371 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Radiological Emergency Response Planning and Preparedness Program Fund established pursuant to 35 Pa.C.S. § 7320(c). Payments collected under subparagraphs (i)(B) [and], (i.1)(B) and (i.2)(B) shall be deposited into the Radiation Emergency Response Fund. For the purposes of this subsection only, a nuclear power reactor site shall be deemed to be the location of one or more individual nuclear power reactors which still has spent nuclear fuel stored onsite, has not been fully dismantled and decommissioned pursuant to applicable Federal law and regulations and has not been granted license termination by the NRC.* * *(4) Prior to the proposed date of a shipment that requires an escort, each shipper of spent nuclear fuel, high-level waste, transuranic waste or a large quantity of radioactive material who ships to, within, through or across the boundaries of this Commonwealth shall pay to the agency a fee of [$2,500] $3,000 per individual vehicle shipment or [$4,500] $5,000 per railroad car or river barge shipment.* * *(c.1) Annual fee.--(1) A nuclear power reactor site with one or more reactors that have permanently shut down and had the spent nuclear fuel removed from the reactor vessel, spent nuclear fuel pool and any other temporary storage area with all spent nuclear fuel temporarily stored in dry casks onsite within an NRC-approved ISFSI shall pay the department an annual fee of $100,000 per year before July 1 of each year. The annual fee shall remain in place until all spent nuclear fuel is removed 20260HB2450PN3371 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 from the ISFSI and nuclear power reactor site.(2) An individual nuclear power reactor required to pay the annual fee under this subsection shall not be subject to the fees under subsections (b)(1) and (d) (B.1)(1) AND (C) (1.1) . * * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20260HB2450PN3371 - 6 - <--1234567